Idaho, session 2026, H0919.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Adminis-
tration for the Division of Public Works $72,507,300 to be expended for cap-
ital outlay from the Permanent Building Fund for the period July 1, 2026,
through June 30, 2027.
SECTION 2. ALLOCATION OF FUNDS FOR SPECIFIC PROJECTS. Moneys appropri-
ated in Section 1 of this act, or so much thereof as in each case may be neces-
sary, shall be used for the purpose of paying the cost of any land, building,
or equipment or for the rebuilding, renovation, or repair of buildings,
installations, facilities, or structures at the places, institutions, and
agencies, or their successors, including those listed in this section. The
Permanent Building Fund Advisory Council is hereby authorized and directed
to anticipate revenues accruing to the Permanent Building Fund for the pur-
pose of undertaking the construction, renovation, repair, and acquisitions
authorized, without delay, and to determine the priority of construction
pursuant to which the work described in this section will be undertaken.
MAINTENANCE PROJECTS IN THE FOLLOWING AREAS:
Alteration and repair projects $31,422,500
Building maintenance 34,028,700
Statewide Americans with Disabilities Act compliance 4,666,000
Facilities maintenance 1,500,000
TOTAL $71,617,200


CAPITAL PROJECTS:
Mil Bonneville County Readiness Center design $890,100
GRAND TOTAL $72,507,300
SECTION 3. UTILIZATION OF MATCHING FUNDS. Moneys appropriated in this
act may be made available for matching any allocation of moneys now in ex-
istence or hereafter made available by agencies of the United States and/or
private donations, and the Division of Public Works is authorized to expend,
for the purpose of paying the cost of any land, building, or equipment or for
the rebuilding, renovation, or repair of buildings, moneys appropriated for
public works to various agencies as part of the respective agency operating
budgets, provided the express approval of the Permanent Building Fund Advi-
sory Council is granted to make application for such moneys in each instance.
SECTION 4. REALLOCATION OF PROJECT SAVINGS. The Division of Public
Works may have the flexibility to allocate any savings or unused appro-
priation from any project to any other requested and funded project. The
reallocation of such appropriation must be approved by the Permanent Build-
ing Fund Advisory Council prior to the funds being spent.
SECTION 5. REPORTING. The Division of Public Works shall provide a re-
port to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee on the status of capital
projects, statewide deferred maintenance, alterations and repairs, Capitol
Mall and Chinden Campus facilities maintenance, Americans with Disabilities
Act compliance projects, and asbestos abatement. The report will identify
completed projects, total expenditures and commitments by capital project,
and estimated costs for each capital project for the current fiscal year.
The report will also provide a narrative explanation for any capital project
for which construction has not started, or that the division does not an-
ticipate will start, within 24 months of initial appropriation from the
Permanent Building Fund. The report will: identify all capital projects
for which construction activity has not begun in the four years from initial
appropriation; provide an accounting of any unexpended and unencumbered
appropriation balance remaining for a completed capital project; and pro-
vide an accounting of any unexpended and unencumbered appropriation balance
remaining for alterations and repairs, facilities maintenance, asbestos
abatement, or Americans with Disabilities Act projects five years from
the initial appropriation. Such report shall be provided to the Joint Fi-
nance-Appropriations Committee and the Budget and Policy Analysis Division
of the Legislative Services Office no later than November 15, 2026.
SECTION 6. NEW APPROPRIATION FOR UNREALIZED CAPITAL PROJECTS. Notwith-
standing the provision of any law to the contrary, any appropriation from the
Permanent Building Fund for a capital project for which construction activ-
ity has not begun in the four years from its initial appropriation shall be
available for consideration for new appropriation. The Permanent Building
Fund Advisory Council and Division of Public Works shall identify such funds


and make a recommendation for their use in its budget submission in November
2026.
SECTION 7. NEW APPROPRIATION FOR REMAINING BALANCES. Notwithstanding
the provision of any law to the contrary, any unexpended and unencumbered
appropriation balance remaining for a completed capital project, and any
appropriation for alterations and repairs or facilities maintenance with an
unexpended and unencumbered balance remaining five years from its initial
appropriation, shall be available for new appropriation. The Permanent
Building Fund Advisory Council shall identify such funds and make a recom-
mendation for their use in its budget submission in November 2026.
SECTION 8. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 9. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.